Utah statutes.
63A-2-103.   General services provided -- Subscription by state departments, state agencies, and certain local governmental entities -- Fee schedule.

(1) (a)  The director of the division shall operate, manage, and maintain:

(i)  a central mailing service;

(ii)  an electronic central store system for procuring goods and services; and

(iii)  the state surplus property program in accordance with Part 4, Surplus Property Services.

(b)  The director may establish microfilming, duplicating, printing, addressograph, and other central services.

(2) (a)  Each state department and agency shall subscribe to all of the services described in Subsections (1)(a)(i) and (ii), unless the director delegates the director's authority to a department or agency under Section 63A-2-104.

(b)  An institution of higher education, school district, or political subdivision of the state may subscribe to one or more of the services described in Subsections (1)(a)(i) and (ii).

(3)  The director shall:

(a)  prescribe a schedule of fees to be charged for all services provided by the division to any department or agency after the director:

(i)  submits the proposed rate, fees, or other amounts for services provided by the division's internal service fund to the Rate Committee established in Section 63A-1-114; and

(ii)  obtains the approval of the Legislature, as required by Sections 63J-1-410 and 63J-1-504;

(b)  when practicable, ensure that the fees are approximately equal to the cost of providing the services; and

(c)  periodically conduct a market analysis of fees, which analysis shall include comparison of the division's rates with the fees of other public or private sector providers where comparable services and rates are reasonably available.

